Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202670-663
Amendment; approval procedure.

Upon authorization as provided in section 70-662, the proposed amendment shall thereupon be submitted to the Nebraska Power Review Board, together with a petition setting forth the reasons for the adoption of such amendment, and requesting that the same be approved. The Nebraska Power Review Board shall then cause notice to be given by publication for three consecutive weeks in two legal newspapers of general circulation within such district. Such notice shall set forth in full the proposed amendment and set a date, not sooner than three weeks after the last date of publication of the notice, for protests, complaints, or objections to be filed with the Nebraska Power Review Board in opposition to the adoption of such amendment. The cost of such publication shall be paid by such district. If any person residing in such district, or affected by the proposed amendment, shall, within the time provided, file a protest, complaint, or objection, the Nebraska Power Review Board shall schedule a hearing and give due notice thereof to the district, the district's representative, and the person who filed such protest, complaint, or objection. Any person filing a protest, complaint, or objection may appear at such hearing and contest the approval by the Nebraska Power Review Board of such proposed amendment. After all protests, complaints, or objections have been heard, the Nebraska Power Review Board shall act upon the petition and either approve or disapprove the amendment. If no protests, complaints, or objections are properly filed, the board shall either approve the amendment without a hearing or schedule a hearing to determine whether or not the amendment should be approved. If a hearing is scheduled, due notice shall be provided to the district and the district representative.

Laws 1937, c. 152, § 9, p. 589;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-717;

R.S.1943, § 70-663;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 28;

Laws 1983, LB 366, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB285, § 18;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 71.